Tennessee statutes. Title 71 Welfare
Part 5 Child Care Agencies
71-3-514. Establishment of drug testing policy.

All persons or entities operating a child care agency as defined in this part, unless exempt as provided in § 71-3-503, shall establish a drug testing policy for employees, directors, licensees and operators of child care agencies and for other persons providing services under contract or for remuneration for the agency, who have direct contact, as defined by the department, with a child in the care of the agency.

The policy shall specify how testing should be completed by the child care agency and provide for immediate and effective enforcement action involving such persons by the child care agency in the event of a positive drug test.

The policy shall be provided by the child care agency to persons employed or engaged for contract or remunerative services prior to July 1, 2009, and to all such persons upon initial employment or initial engagement in contract or remunerative services for the agency.

The policy established pursuant to this section shall not supersede the requirements of § 71-3-502(d)(7)(C)(v) that all persons described in § 71-3-502(d)(7)(C)(v) satisfactorily complete a drug test prior to engaging in transportation services for children in a child care agency.

The policy shall require drug testing based upon reasonable suspicion that employees, directors, licensees, or operators of a child care agency, or other persons providing services under contract or for remuneration for the agency are engaged in the use of illegal drugs.

The policy shall require persons employed or engaged for contract or remunerative services prior to July 1, 2009, to have a drug test based upon reasonable suspicion that the persons are engaged in the use of illegal drugs.

Events that may give rise to reasonable suspicion for purposes of requiring a drug test include, but are not limited to:

Deterioration in job performance or changes in personal traits or characteristics;

Appearance in a specific incident or observation which indicates that an individual is under the present influence of drugs;

Changes in personal behavior not attributable to other factors;

Involvement in or contribution to an accident where the use of drugs is reasonably suspected, regardless of whether the accident involves actual injury; or

Alleged violation of or conviction of criminal drug law statutes involving the use of illegal drugs or prescription drugs.

A child care agency shall, at no expense to the state, maintain for five (5) years and immediately make available to the department upon request a copy of drug testing results for an individual who is employed as a caregiver, director, licensee or operator at the child care agency, or for other persons providing services under contract or for remuneration for the agency, who have direct contact with children in the care of the agency.

It shall be the responsibility of the individual who is to be tested to pay the appropriate fees necessary to obtain a drug test pursuant to the policy established by a child care agency. Drug testing results obtained under this section are confidential and may be disclosed only for purposes of enforcing this part.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), a licensee or operator of a family child care home who has direct contact with children in the care of the family child care home shall submit to a drug test at the expense of the licensee or operator, when the department has reasonable suspicion to believe that the licensee or operator is engaged in the use of illegal drugs.

A child care agency that does not comply with this section is subject to the department:

Denying the application for a license;

Denying the application for a license renewal; or

Suspending or revoking a license issued.

Acts 2008, ch. 1068, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2008, ch. 1068, § 2 provided that the department of human services is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this section. The rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Former §§71-3-514 —71-3-523 (Acts 1953, ch. 228, § 6-15 (Williams, § 4765.143—4765.152); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1414 — 14-1423, §§14-10-114 —14-10-123), were repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 1, effective July 1, 2000.

71-3-515. Development of procedure for submitting names and other identifying information to determine if persons have perpetrated abuse or neglect of a child or adult — Due process rights.

The department of children's services and the department of human services shall develop a procedure whereby the names and other identifying information for all potential employees of the department of human services in that department's licensing division and adult protective services program and any persons who are subject to § 71-2-403 or § 71-3-507, and who, under those sections, may have contact with children in a childcare agency or with adults in an adult day care agency licensed by the department of human services, shall be submitted to the department of children's services and the department of human services adult protective services program to determine if the potential employees or other persons subject to those provisions were found by the department of children's services or the department of human services adult protective services program to have perpetrated abuse or neglect of a child or adult.

No person shall be reported as an indicated perpetrator of abuse or neglect for purposes of this part or chapter 2, part 4 of this title, by either the department of children's services or the department of human services adult protective services program unless it is determined that the due process rights of the person were either offered, but not accepted, or were fully concluded pursuant to the rules of the department of children's services or the department of human services and applicable state and federal law.

Acts 2009, ch. 410, § 3; 2013, ch. 101, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§71-3-515 —71-3-523 (Acts 1953, ch. 228, § 6-15 (Williams, § 4765.143—4765.152); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 14-1414 — 14-1423, §§14-10-114 —14-10-123), were repealed by Acts 2000, ch. 981, § 1, effective July 1, 2000.

71-3-516. Restrictions on license for drop-in center regarding care of school-age children on snow days.

Any license for a drop-in center issued under this part shall specify whether the center is appropriate for handling school-age children on snow days. A drop-in center may not accept any school-age child for care unless the department determines that center is an appropriate and safe location for such children on snow days. The department shall determine whether the center has adequate space for school-age children and shall set a limit on the number of such children that a center may accept on any one day. No child thirteen (13) years of age or older may be cared for by a drop-in center on a snow day. The center shall also provide to the department a list of trained care givers and other staff who are available for emergency calling and shall annually update such list.

Acts 2005, ch. 93, § 2; T.C.A., §71-3-534.

Code Commission Notes.

Former §71-3-534 was transferred to §71-3-516 by the code commission in 2012.

71-3-517. Development of a written multi-hazard plan to protect children in emergencies.

All persons or entities operating a child care agency as defined in this part, excluding drop-in child care centers and those programs and facilities exempt from licensing as provided in § 71-3-503, shall, in consultation with appropriate local authorities and local emergency management, develop a written multi-hazard plan to protect children in the event of emergencies, including, but not limited to, fires, tornados, earthquakes, chemical spills, and floods. Such persons or entities shall also inform parents and guardians of children attending the child care agency of the plan.

The written plan required pursuant to this section shall include:

Procedures for child care agency staff to notify parents in an emergency;

The development of designated relocation sites and evacuation routes to those sites;

Reunification plans for children and families; and

Written individualized plans for accommodating a child's special needs in an emergency situation.

The child care agency shall maintain documentation that the emergency plan is reviewed monthly.

All child care agency staff persons shall be trained on the plan annually.

The child care agency shall implement these emergency procedures through timely practice drills to meet local regulations and local emergency services plans and shall maintain documentation of drills for one (1) year. Such drills shall involve the following:

At least one (1) fire drill shall be conducted monthly;

Child care agencies shall alternate drills each month to cover each shift while children are present, including extended care hours;

At least one (1) drill other than fire shall be conducted every six (6) months; and

All drills shall be conducted in such a way as to simulate, as closely as is practical, conditions of a real emergency, with alarms to be utilized and evacuation plans to be practiced.

Emergency telephone numbers for the following entities shall be posted next to all child care agency telephones and shall be readily available to all child care agency staff members:

Fire department;

Police department and sheriff's office;

Nearest hospital emergency room;

Department of children's services child abuse hotline;

Local emergency management agency;

Ambulance or rescue squad;

Poison control center; and

Department of human services child care complaint hotline.

If a generic emergency number, including, but not limited to, 911 service, is operable in the community, it shall also be posted in the manner prescribed in this subsection (f).

All contact information for parents, guardians, and emergency personnel shall be readily available to all child care agency staff, including work, home and cell phone numbers.

Acts 2013, ch. 216, § 1.

71-3-518. Priority on wait list of children with parent or guardian serving on active duty in armed forces.

Unless otherwise prohibited by federal or state law, no child care agency licensed under this part shall place a dependent child on a wait list behind a child without a parent or legal guardian serving on active duty in the armed services of the United States, if the dependent child:

Has a parent or legal guardian that is an active-duty member of the armed services of the United States; or

Has a parent who was killed, died as a direct result of injuries received or has been officially reported as being either a prisoner of war or missing in action while serving honorably as a member of the United States armed forces during a qualifying period of armed conflict or was formerly a prisoner of war or missing in action under such circumstances.

To be eligible under subdivision (a)(2), the dependent child or the legal guardian of the dependent child shall:

Present official certification from the United States government that the parent veteran was killed or died as a direct result of injuries received while serving honorably as a member of the United States armed forces during a qualifying period of armed conflict; or

Present official certification from the United States government that the parent veteran has been officially reported as being a prisoner of war or missing in action while serving honorably as a member of the United States armed forces during a qualifying period of armed conflict or was formerly a prisoner of war or missing in action under such circumstances as appropriate within one hundred and eighty (180) days prior to applying for child care services.

As used in this section, “dependent child”, “qualifying period of armed conflict”, and “serving honorably” have the same meanings as in § 49-7-102.

Acts 2013, ch. 291, § 1; 2014, ch. 972, § 2.